Hawaii statutes.
§435E-3 Rules. The commissioner may
adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to implement this chapter, subject to
chapter 91. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 203, §16]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next